Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1220
County attorney; deputy county attorney; failure to complete continuing legal education; Attorney General; commence civil action.

Upon being advised by the commission of a failure on the part of a county attorney or deputy county attorney to complete the number of hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, required by section 23-1217, the Attorney General shall commence a civil action in the district court of the county in which the county attorney holds office, or in the case of a deputy county attorney in the district court of the county in which he or she is employed, seeking his or her removal from office or employment. Such action shall be brought in the name of the county. Such action shall be tried in the same manner as other civil actions under Chapter 25, except that such action shall be tried exclusively to the court without a jury.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 6.